Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2409
Replevy of fine and costs; recognizance; breach; effect.

It shall be lawful for any person or persons convicted of any criminal offense to replevy the judgment for the fine and costs, or the costs only when no fine shall be imposed, by such convicted person or persons, with one or more good and sufficient freeholders, entering into a recognizance before the court or magistrate, to the people of this state, for the payment of such fine and costs, or costs only, within five months from the date of the acknowledgment; which recognizance so taken is hereby declared valid in law, and to create a lien on the real estate of all such persons as shall acknowledge the same. Upon the breach thereof, execution shall be issued against the goods and chattels, lands and tenements of the persons who entered into the recognizance, in the same manner as if it had been a judgment, which execution shall be collected in the same manner as is prescribed in section 29-2408. No scire facias shall be necessary previous to issuing such execution.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 526, p. 838;

R.S.1913, § 9196;

C.S.1922, § 10203;

C.S.1929, § 29-2409;

R.S.1943, § 29-2409.